West Virginia, session 2026, HB4828.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 13A. PUBLIC SERVICE DISTRICTS. §16-13A-26. Publication of notice of federal or state violations. When a public service district has received notice of any alleged federal violation that also indicates or triggers an alleged state violation, requiring two separate public notices of federal and state violations, the public service district may include in one publication of notice both of the alleged violations, notwithstanding any other provision of this code or rule.